Hawaii, session 2026, SB2706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity, in collaboration with the university of Hawaii's Leeward community college and department of human resources development, a five-year agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program to equip interested students with the necessary entry-level knowledge, skill set, expertise, and advancement potential in the field of agriculture and biosecurity. (b) The agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program shall: (1)  Develop a curriculum of a broad spectrum of topics relevant to agriculture and biosecurity; (2)  Provide practical, hands-on training and work opportunities that allow students to gain real-world experience in the agriculture and biosecurity sector; provided that the training and provision of work opportunities shall not interfere with the existing operations of the department of agriculture and biosecurity; and (3)  Encourage additional training and credential attainment by offering increased compensation to participants who transition into agriculture and biosecurity employment. (c) The department of agriculture and biosecurity, in collaboration with the university of Hawaii's Leeward community college and department of human resources development, shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations on the agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2031. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) positions to administer the pilot program; and (2)  $ for program participants for program registration and fees, supplies, books, and other related expenses. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.